lexd_components/hyw-nouns_lex_irreg.lexd
################################
#### Lexicon of nouns which are present in Kouyoumdjian's dictionary "A comprehensive dictionary Armenian-English"
### These are nouns which are based on potentially irregular roots

#Monosyllabic nouns which arbitrary take -ner 
#When forming their possessive plural, I have to manually add the ն before the possessive plural
LEXICON NounIrregMonoNerOld   #Some prescriptively take -ner, but in real life, they take -er


բեռ:բեռ  #Taken from Hagopian 350
սայլաբեռ:սայլաբեռ{mono}

դուռ:դուռ
ականջդուռ:ականջդուռ{mono}
բաժադուռ:բաժադուռ{mono}
գաղտադուռ:գաղտադուռ{mono}
դարձադուռ:դարձադուռ{mono}
ծալադուռ:ծալադուռ{mono}
մեռելադուռ:մեռելադուռ{mono}
վերնադուռ:վերնադուռ{mono}

եզ:եզ
մշկեզ:մշկեզ{mono}

թոռ:թոռ
հարս:հարս
նորահարս:նորահարս{mono}


մատ:մատ
բթամատ:բթամատ{mono}
բութամատ:բութամատ{mono}
ձագմատ:ձագմատ{mono}
սանդղամատ:սանդղամատ{mono}
վանդակամատ:վանդակամատ{mono}

մուկ:մուկ
այծեմուկ:այծեմուկ{mono}
արջամուկ:արջամուկ{mono}
արտամուկ:արտամուկ{mono}
գետամուկ:գետամուկ{mono}
գետնամուկ:գետնամուկ{mono}
գիշերամուկ:գիշերամուկ{mono}
դաշտամուկ:դաշտամուկ{mono}
թեւամուկ:թեւամուկ{mono}
թռամուկ:թռամուկ{mono}
խլրդամուկ:խլրդամուկ{mono}
ծառամուկ:ծառամուկ{mono}
հոլամուկ:հոլամուկ{mono}
ճագարամուկ:ճագարամուկ{mono}
մարգամուկ:մարգամուկ{mono}
մշկամուկ:մշկամուկ{mono}
ննջամուկ:ննջամուկ{mono}
շիկամուկ:շիկամուկ{mono}
ջրամուկ:ջրամուկ{mono}
սեւամուկ:սեւամուկ{mono}
տնամուկ:տնամուկ{mono}
ցայտամուկ:ցայտամուկ{mono}
փղամուկ:փղամուկ{mono}

ձուկ:ձուկ
հրձուկ:հրձուկ{mono}
աչաձուկ:աչաձուկ{mono}
բրաձուկ:բրաձուկ{mono}
թիաձուկ:թիաձուկ{mono}
թռաձուկ:թռաձուկ{mono}
թրաձուկ:թրաձուկ{mono}
իժաձուկ:իժաձուկ{mono}
իշաձուկ:իշաձուկ{mono}
կզաձուկ:կզաձուկ{mono}
կժաձուկ:կժաձուկ{mono}
հրաձուկ:հրաձուկ{mono}
ձիաձուկ:ձիաձուկ{mono}
սրաձուկ:սրաձուկ{mono}
տքաձուկ:տքաձուկ{mono}
ցլաձուկ:ցլաձուկ{mono}
փղաձուկ:փղաձուկ{mono}
փշաձուկ:փշաձուկ{mono}
փքաձուկ:փքաձուկ{mono}
քնաձուկ:քնաձուկ{mono}
այծեձուկ:այծեձուկ{mono}
ասրաձուկ:ասրաձուկ{mono}
բազէձուկ:բազէձուկ{mono}
բահաձուկ:բահաձուկ{mono}
բստաձուկ:բստաձուկ{mono}
գլխաձուկ:գլխաձուկ{mono}
գնդաձուկ:գնդաձուկ{mono}
գողաձուկ:գողաձուկ{mono}
գրգաձուկ:գրգաձուկ{mono}
դեւաձուկ:դեւաձուկ{mono}
թակաձուկ:թակաձուկ{mono}
թոքաձուկ:թոքաձուկ{mono}
լուսաձուկ:լուսաձուկ{mono}
լսնաձուկ:լսնաձուկ{mono}
լօռաձուկ:լօռաձուկ{mono}
խաղաձուկ:խաղաձուկ{mono}
խառաձուկ:խառաձուկ{mono}
խարաձուկ:խարաձուկ{mono}
խլնաձուկ:խլնաձուկ{mono}
խոզաձուկ:խոզաձուկ{mono}
խռկաձուկ:խռկաձուկ{mono}
խռպաձուկ:խռպաձուկ{mono}
խստաձուկ:խստաձուկ{mono}
կնճաձուկ:կնճաձուկ{mono}
կովաձուկ:կովաձուկ{mono}
կտցաձուկ:կտցաձուկ{mono}
ձողաձուկ:ձողաձուկ{mono}
մածաձուկ:մածաձուկ{mono}
մոմաձուկ:մոմաձուկ{mono}
մրճաձուկ:մրճաձուկ{mono}
մօրաձուկ:մօրաձուկ{mono}
նետաձուկ:նետաձուկ{mono}
նռնաձուկ:նռնաձուկ{mono}
նրբաձուկ:նրբաձուկ{mono}
շանաձուկ:շանաձուկ{mono}
շնկաձուկ:շնկաձուկ{mono}
ոզնեձուկ:ոզնեձուկ{mono}
ոսկեձուկ:ոսկեձուկ{mono}
որփաձուկ:որփաձուկ{mono}
ուռնաձուկ:ուռնաձուկ{mono}
պրկաձուկ:պրկաձուկ{mono}
ռնգաձուկ:ռնգաձուկ{mono}
սահաձուկ:սահաձուկ{mono}
սելաձուկ:սելաձուկ{mono}
սեկաձուկ:սեկաձուկ{mono}
սեւաձուկ:սեւաձուկ{mono}
սոխաձուկ:սոխաձուկ{mono}
վիմաձուկ:վիմաձուկ{mono}
տափաձուկ:տափաձուկ{mono}
տիգաձուկ:տիգաձուկ{mono}
փառաձուկ:փառաձուկ{mono}
փողաձուկ:փողաձուկ{mono}
քարաձուկ:քարաձուկ{mono}
աստղաձուկ:աստղաձուկ{mono}
արեւաձուկ:արեւաձուկ{mono}
արկղաձուկ:արկղաձուկ{mono}
աւարաձուկ:աւարաձուկ{mono}
աքարաձուկ:աքարաձուկ{mono}
գայլաձուկ:գայլաձուկ{mono}
գառնաձուկ:գառնաձուկ{mono}
գետնաձուկ:գետնաձուկ{mono}
գլխանձուկ:գլխանձուկ{mono}
գորտաձուկ:գորտաձուկ{mono}
դրօշաձուկ:դրօշաձուկ{mono}
երիզաձուկ:երիզաձուկ{mono}
երփնաձուկ:երփնաձուկ{mono}
զրահաձուկ:զրահաձուկ{mono}
թիւմաձուկ:թիւմաձուկ{mono}
թմբկաձուկ:թմբկաձուկ{mono}
թմբրաձուկ:թմբրաձուկ{mono}
ժայռաձուկ:ժայռաձուկ{mono}
լեզուաձուկ:լեզուաձուկ{mono}
լճակաձուկ:լճակաձուկ{mono}
լուսնաձուկ:լուսնաձուկ{mono}
խայթաձուկ:խայթաձուկ{mono}
խայտաձուկ:խայտաձուկ{mono}
խանչաձուկ:խանչաձուկ{mono}
խանջաձուկ:խանջաձուկ{mono}
խարդաձուկ:խարդաձուկ{mono}
խորդաձուկ:խորդաձուկ{mono}
խռնջաձուկ:խռնջաձուկ{mono}
կաթնաձուկ:կաթնաձուկ{mono}
կաստաձուկ:կաստաձուկ{mono}
կատուաձուկ:կատուաձուկ{mono}
կարթաձուկ:կարթաձուկ{mono}
կելպաձուկ:կելպաձուկ{mono}
կռնկաձուկ:կռնկաձուկ{mono}
հասկաձուկ:հասկաձուկ{mono}
հաստաձուկ:հաստաձուկ{mono}
ձգանաձուկ:ձգանաձուկ{mono}
մագլաձուկ:մագլաձուկ{mono}
մանգաձուկ:մանգաձուկ{mono}
մերկաձուկ:մերկաձուկ{mono}
մօրուաձուկ:մօրուաձուկ{mono}
նշդրաձուկ:նշդրաձուկ{mono}
նշտրաձուկ:նշտրաձուկ{mono}
շեղբաձուկ:շեղբաձուկ{mono}
շերտաձուկ:շերտաձուկ{mono}
ոսկրաձուկ:ոսկրաձուկ{mono}
պարկաձուկ:պարկաձուկ{mono}
ռազմաձուկ:ռազմաձուկ{mono}
սակրաձուկ:սակրաձուկ{mono}
սարդաձուկ:սարդաձուկ{mono}
սափրաձուկ:սափրաձուկ{mono}
սղոցաձուկ:սղոցաձուկ{mono}
սպիտաձուկ:սպիտաձուկ{mono}
սրնգաձուկ:սրնգաձուկ{mono}
վարդաձուկ:վարդաձուկ{mono}
տարմաձուկ:տարմաձուկ{mono}
տիկնաձուկ:տիկնաձուկ{mono}
ցայտաձուկ:ցայտաձուկ{mono}
փայլաձուկ:փայլաձուկ{mono}
փայտաձուկ:փայտաձուկ{mono}
օղակաձուկ:օղակաձուկ{mono}
ագռաւաձուկ:ագռաւաձուկ{mono}
աղուեսաձուկ:աղուեսաձուկ{mono}
աշնանաձուկ:աշնանաձուկ{mono}
առիւծաձուկ:առիւծաձուկ{mono}
ասպարաձուկ:ասպարաձուկ{mono}
արծաթաձուկ:արծաթաձուկ{mono}
արքայաձուկ:արքայաձուկ{mono}
գոմիշաձուկ:գոմիշաձուկ{mono}
դորակաձուկ:դորակաձուկ{mono}
դրախտաձուկ:դրախտաձուկ{mono}
եղջերաձուկ:եղջերաձուկ{mono}
թութակաձուկ:թութակաձուկ{mono}
իշխանաձուկ:իշխանաձուկ{mono}
խարակաձուկ:խարակաձուկ{mono}
ծիրանաձուկ:ծիրանաձուկ{mono}
կանաչաձուկ:կանաչաձուկ{mono}
կարանաձուկ:կարանաձուկ{mono}
կարիճաձուկ:կարիճաձուկ{mono}
կարմրաձուկ:կարմրաձուկ{mono}
կիթառաձուկ:կիթառաձուկ{mono}
կոհակաձուկ:կոհակաձուկ{mono}
հայելաձուկ:հայելաձուկ{mono}
հովանաձուկ:հովանաձուկ{mono}
ճագարաձուկ:ճագարաձուկ{mono}
մելանաձուկ:մելանաձուկ{mono}
մողիզաձուկ:մողիզաձուկ{mono}
մօրինաձուկ:մօրինաձուկ{mono}
նիզակաձուկ:նիզակաձուկ{mono}
պանանաձուկ:պանանաձուկ{mono}
պիսակաձուկ:պիսակաձուկ{mono}
սկիւռաձուկ:սկիւռաձուկ{mono}
ստուերաձուկ:ստուերաձուկ{mono}
վահանաձուկ:վահանաձուկ{mono}
վարազաձուկ:վարազաձուկ{mono}
վարնգաձուկ:վարնգաձուկ{mono}
վիշապաձուկ:վիշապաձուկ{mono}
գեղարդաձուկ:գեղարդաձուկ{mono}
ելեկտրաձուկ:ելեկտրաձուկ{mono}
լապտերաձուկ:լապտերաձուկ{mono}
խարտոցաձուկ:խարտոցաձուկ{mono}
ծիածանաձուկ:ծիածանաձուկ{mono}
ծիծեռնաձուկ:ծիծեռնաձուկ{mono}
կենդանաձուկ:կենդանաձուկ{mono}
ճերմակաձուկ:ճերմակաձուկ{mono}
յամպարաձուկ:յամպարաձուկ{mono}
նաւուղղաձուկ:նաւուղղաձուկ{mono}
պատեանաձուկ:պատեանաձուկ{mono}
սկուտեղաձուկ:սկուտեղաձուկ{mono}
սպիտակաձուկ:սպիտակաձուկ{mono}
առագաստաձուկ:առագաստաձուկ{mono}
կաղամարաձուկ:կաղամարաձուկ{mono}
հրեշտակաձուկ:հրեշտակաձուկ{mono}
մանիշակաձուկ:մանիշակաձուկ{mono}
մանուշակաձուկ:մանուշակաձուկ{mono}
մարգարտաձուկ:մարգարտաձուկ{mono}

ձեռ:ձեռ
ոտ:ոտ
ռուս:ռուս
շուրթ:շուրթ #reassigned based on Essayan

# մահ:մահ # removed because the word has too many other irregular forms + the ner form is obsolete


LEXICON NounIrregMonoNerStill  #Only very few both descriptively and presriptively  take -ner
լեռ:լեռ
հրալեռ:հրալեռ{mono}
սառնալեռ:սառնալեռ{mono}


LEXICON NounIrregU
#These words take ու in the dative
#I allow them to optionally take ի 
#This don't have high vowels that can reduce
հայ:հայ #Taken from Hagopian 351
ամերիկահայ:ամերիկահայ{mono}
անգլիահայ:անգլիահայ{mono}
եգիպտահայ:եգիպտահայ{mono}
թրքահայ:թրքահայ{mono}
իտալահայ:իտալահայ{mono}
լատինահայ:լատինահայ{mono}
լեհահայ:լեհահայ{mono}
լիբանահայ:լիբանահայ{mono}
կովկասահայ:կովկասահայ{mono}
հնդկահայ:հնդկահայ{mono}
հունգարահայ:հունգարահայ{mono}
յունահայ:յունահայ{mono}
պարսկահայ:պարսկահայ{mono}
պուլկարահայ:պուլկարահայ{mono}
ռումանահայ:ռումանահայ{mono}
ռուսահայ:ռուսահայ{mono}
տաճկահայ:տաճկահայ{mono}

ձի:ձի
այգաձի:այգաձի{mono}
աշխէտաձի:աշխէտաձի{mono}
արշաւաձի:արշաւաձի{mono}
գաղտորձի:գաղտորձի{mono}
գետաձի:գետաձի{mono}
եզնաձի:եզնաձի{mono}
եղջերուաձի:եղջերուաձի{mono}
ծովաձի:ծովաձի{mono}
կիսաձի:կիսաձի{mono}
կովաձի:կովաձի{mono}
մարդաձի:մարդաձի{mono}
սայլաձի:սայլաձի{mono}
վագերաձի:վագերաձի{mono}


մանչ:մանչ
չին:չին
չար:չար
գահ:գահ # Not taking compounds because I think the inflection doesn't percolate
պահ:պահ # Not taking compounds because I think the inflection doesn't percolate


դար:դար
արծաթադար:արծաթադար{mono}
դար:դար
զինադադար:զինադադար{mono}
միջնադար:միջնադար{mono}
ոսկեդար:ոսկեդար{mono}
պղնձադար:պղնձադար{mono}

ծով:ծով
աշխարհածով:աշխարհածով{mono}
լճածով:լճածով{mono}
մեծածով:մեծածով{mono}
միջածով:միջածով{mono}

կով:կով
մրջնակով:մրջնակով{mono}
ջրակով:ջրակով{mono}
ծովակով:ծովակով{mono}

հաւ:հաւ
ջրհաւ:ջրհաւ{mono}
վշհաւ:վշհաւ{mono}
լեղակահաւ:լեղակահաւ{mono}
ջրահաւ:ջրահաւ{mono}
վշահաւ:վշահաւ{mono}
օձահաւ:օձահաւ{mono}
ժրահաւ:ժրահաւ{mono}
լաշհաւ:լաշհաւ{mono}
ճչահաւ:ճչահաւ{mono}
շքահաւ:շքահաւ{mono}
սառնահաւ:սառնահաւ{mono}
արտահաւ:արտահաւ{mono}
բռնահաւ:բռնահաւ{mono}
երգահաւ:երգահաւ{mono}
ծովահաւ:ծովահաւ{mono}
հծծահաւ:հծծահաւ{mono}
մօրահաւ:մօրահաւ{mono}
նաւահաւ:նաւահաւ{mono}
շիկահաւ:շիկահաւ{mono}
սիրահաւ:սիրահաւ{mono}
սուզահաւ:սուզահաւ{mono}
ցախահաւ:ցախահաւ{mono}
փողահաւ:փողահաւ{mono}
քաջահաւ:քաջահաւ{mono}
թագահաւ:թագահաւ{mono}
խօլահաւ:խօլահաւ{mono}
ծառահաւ:ծառահաւ{mono}
մոշահաւ:մոշահաւ{mono}
պճնահաւ:պճնահաւ{mono}
նախահաւ:նախահաւ{mono}
արեւահաւ:արեւահաւ{mono}
արծուահաւ:արծուահաւ{mono}
աւազահաւ:աւազահաւ{mono}
ծաղկահաւ:ծաղկահաւ{mono}
կաղնահաւ:կաղնահաւ{mono}
կատուահաւ:կատուահաւ{mono}
կուինահաւ:կուինահաւ{mono}
հնդկահաւ:հնդկահաւ{mono}
պտերահաւ:պտերահաւ{mono}
տարմահաւ:տարմահաւ{mono}
քնարահաւ:քնարահաւ{mono}
խայտահաւ:խայտահաւ{mono}
խաշնահաւ:խաշնահաւ{mono}
ձայնահաւ:ձայնահաւ{mono}
մեղրահաւ:մեղրահաւ{mono}
մրրկահաւ:մրրկահաւ{mono}
շամբահաւ:շամբահաւ{mono}
ցցունահաւ:ցցունահաւ{mono}
փրփրահաւ:փրփրահաւ{mono}
արքայահաւ:արքայահաւ{mono}
բասանահաւ:բասանահաւ{mono}
դշխոյահաւ:դշխոյահաւ{mono}
դրախտահաւ:դրախտահաւ{mono}
եգիպտահաւ:եգիպտահաւ{mono}
եղեւնահաւ:եղեւնահաւ{mono}
թանձրահաւ:թանձրահաւ{mono}
ծիրանահաւ:ծիրանահաւ{mono}
մացառահաւ:մացառահաւ{mono}
մտրակահաւ:մտրակահաւ{mono}
նումիտահաւ:նումիտահաւ{mono}
պուրակահաւ:պուրակահաւ{mono}
գիշերահաւ:գիշերահաւ{mono}
երաշտահաւ:երաշտահաւ{mono}
խորտկահաւ:խորտկահաւ{mono}
կանաչահաւ:կանաչահաւ{mono}
հանգրահաւ:հանգրահաւ{mono}
մարախահաւ:մարախահաւ{mono}
վարազահաւ:վարազահաւ{mono}
սկզբնահաւ:սկզբնահաւ{mono}
անձրեւահաւ:անձրեւահաւ{mono}
զանգակահաւ:զանգակահաւ{mono}
փոթորկահաւ:փոթորկահաւ{mono}
եղջերուահաւ:եղջերուահաւ{mono}
մորպետահաւ:մորպետահաւ{mono}
արտաւազդահաւ:արտաւազդահաւ{mono}


արջ:արջ
մկնարջ:մկնարջ{mono}
յամրարջ:յամրարջ{mono}
պարկարջ:պարկարջ{mono}

թի:թի
հրթի:հրթի{mono}

արեւ:արեւ
ընդդէմարեւ:ընդդէմարեւ
շրջարեւ:շրջարեւ



#Some nouns optionally take irregular inflection
#When they do, they reduce
LEXICON NounIrregUReducePoly
ամիս:ամիս # Risky to treat percolate irregular reduction to compounds
գլուխ:գլուխ # Risky to treat percolate irregular reduction to compounds


#Time words which take the ուան declension
LEXICON NounTimeVan
մահ:մահ
ժանտամահ:ժանտամահ{mono}
խաշնամահ:խաշնամահ{mono}
մարդամահ:մարդամահ{mono}
յանկարծամահ:յանկարծամահ{mono}

օր:օր
կէսօր:կէսօր
հասարակօր:հասարակօր{mono}
մեծօր:մեծօր{mono}
մէջօր:մէջօր{mono}
մսուտուօր:մսուտուօր{mono}
քառասնօր:քառասնօր{mono}




ժամանակ:ժամանակ
նախաժամանակ:նախաժամանակ

գիշեր:գիշեր
միջագիշեր:միջագիշեր
նախագիշեր:նախագիշեր
կէսգիշեր:կէսգիշեր

ցերեկ:ցերեկ
վաղը:վաղ
երէկ:երէկ
ատեն:ատեն
ամառ:ամառ
միջնամառ:միջնամառ

ձմեռ:ձմեռ

ցորեկ:ցորեկ

ուրբաթ:ուրբաթ

LEXICON NounTimeVanU
#words which take the -van declension class, but can also do dative -u

ժամ:ժամ
գիշերաժամ:գիշերաժամ{mono}
դատարկաժամ:դատարկաժամ{mono}
զարթաժամ:զարթաժամ{mono}
ժողովաժամ:ժողովաժամ{mono}
իրիկնաժամ:իրիկնաժամ{mono}
կիսաժամ:կիսաժամ{mono}
հակաժամ:հակաժամ{mono}
ճաշաժամ:ճաշաժամ{mono}
ճգնաժամ:ճգնաժամ{mono}
մահտարաժամ:մահտարաժամ{mono}
յապաժամ:յապաժամ{mono}
յետաժամ:յետաժամ{mono}
ննջաժամ:ննջաժամ{mono}
պայմանաժամ:պայմանաժամ{mono}
վճարաժամ:վճարաժամ{mono}
տօթաժամ:տօթաժամ{mono}


#Time words which reduce a final vowel or substring in inflected forms
LEXICON NounTimeVanReducedBase
ամիս:ամիս

երեքշաբթի:երեքշաբթի
երկուշաբթի:երկուշաբթի
հինգշաբթի:հինգշաբթի
չորեքշաբթի:չորեքշաբթի
մէկշաբթի:մէկշաբթի
կիրակի:կիրակի

իրիկուն:իրիկուն
առտու:առտու
տարի:տարի
հեռու:հեռու

LEXICON NounTimeVanReducedReduced
ամիս:ամս

երեքշաբթի:երեքշաբթ
երկուշաբթի:երկուշաբթ
հինգշաբթի:հինգշաբթ
չորեքշաբթի:չորեքշաբթ
մէկշաբթի:մէկշաբթ
կիրակի:կիրակ

իրիկուն:իրիկ
տարի:տար
առտու:առտ
հեռու:հեռ

#Words which take -van and -u and reduce
LEXICON NounTimeVanUReducedBase
շաբաթ:շաբաթ
զատկաշաբաթ:զատկաշաբաթ
միաշաբաթ:միաշաբաթ

LEXICON NounTimeVanUReducedReduced
շաբաթ:շաբթ
զատկաշաբաթ:զատկաշաբթ
միաշաբաթ:միաշաբթ
